Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1514
Cigarette tax division; rules and regulations.

The division may adopt rules and regulations for the enforcement of the provisions of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518 and may undertake a cost survey as provided for in section 59-1513.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 14, p. 1191.